Alabama, session 2026rs, HB569.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) Beginning September 1, 2026, in addition
to any other tax provided by law, there is levied a sales and
use tax of one-half of one percent for all business activities
covered by Section 45-1-243.01(a)(1), Code of Alabama 1975.
(b) The proceeds of this tax shall be deposited in the
county general fund.
(c) This tax shall be administered according to the
procedures established in Part 4 of Article 24 of Chapter 1 of
Title 45, Code of Alabama 1975.
Section 2. (a) In addition to all other taxes,
beginning September 1, 2026, there is levied a three percent
privilege tax, to be called a rental tax, on each person
leasing or renting tangible personal property in Autauga
County.
(b) The tax levied pursuant to this section shall
parallel the tax imposed by Article 4 of Chapter 12 of Title
40, Code of Alabama 1975. This tax shall apply to the same
persons and transactions to which that tax applies.
(c) The county commission shall provide for the
collection and administration of this tax by resolution.
(d) The proceeds of this tax shall be deposited in the
county general fund.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on September
Page 1

Section 3. This act shall become effective on September
HB569 Enrolled
1, 2026.
Page 2

1, 2026.
HB569 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 17-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 31-Mar-26 Passed



Page 3